South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3340.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 51-3-65 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 51-3-65. Notwithstanding Section 51-3-60, the Department of Parks, Recreation, and Tourism must maintain adjustments in the fee structure directed by the 2002 study committee and implemented in September 2003 in order to maintain fiscal soundness and continued maintenance and operations of the State Park System. South Carolina residents who receive discounts pursuant to Section 51-3-60 must not be given discounts of less than thirty-five percent. Members of the South Carolina National Guard, members and retirees of the Armed Forces of the United States who are South Carolina residents, members of the Reserves who are South Carolina residents, and veterans who are South Carolina residents must be given the same discounts as residents receiving discounts pursuant to Section 51-3-60. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----